Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 518A.44, is amended to read: 518A.44 NOTICE TO PUBLIC AUTHORITY. The petitioner shall notify the public authority of all proceedings for dissolutionnew text begin with childrennew text end , legal separationnew text begin with childrennew text end , determination of parentage, or for the custody of a child, if either party is receiving public assistance or applies for it subsequent to the commencement of the proceeding. The notice must contain the full names of the parties to the proceeding, their Social Security account numbers, and their birth dates. After receipt of the notice, the court shall set child support as provided in section 518A.35. The court may order either or both parents owing a duty of support to a child of the marriage to pay an amount reasonable or necessary for the child's support, without regard to marital misconduct. The court shall approve a child support stipulation of the parties if each party is represented by independent counsel, unless the stipulation does not meet the conditions of section 518A.35. In other cases the court shall determine and order child support in a specific dollar amount in accordance with the guidelines and the other factors set forth in section 518A.43 and any departure therefrom. The court may also order the obligor to pay child support in the form of a percentage share of the obligor's net bonuses, commissions, or other forms of compensation, in addition to, or if the obligor receives no base pay, in lieu of, an order for a specific dollar amount. Sec. 2. Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 12, section 30, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Reports. By July 15, 2025, the Supreme Court Council on Child Protection must submit a progress report on the council's duties under subdivision 5 to the governor, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child protection. By deleted text begin Januarydeleted text end new text begin Decembernew text end 15, 2026, the council must submit its final report to the governor, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child protection, detailing the comprehensive blueprint developed under subdivision 5. Sec. 3. Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 12, section 30, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Expiration. The Supreme Court Council on Child Protection expires deleted text begin upon the submission of its final report under subdivision 6deleted text end new text begin on June 30, 2027new text end . Sec. 4. Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 22, section 6, is amended to read: Sec. 6. SUPREME COURT $ -0- $ 1,000,000 Supreme Court Council on Child Protection. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2025 is for the establishment and administration of the Supreme Court Council on Child Protection. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end . new text begin Notwithstanding Laws 2025, chapter 39, article 1, section 44, any unexpended funds cancel to the general fund.new text end